North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 4. Reports of Officers to General Assembly.

§ 120-12.
Reports from State institutions and departments.

It shall be the duty of the chief officer of each department of the State and of the boards of directors of all institutions supported in whole or in part by appropriations from the State, to submit to the General Assembly, with their respective reports, bills providing for the support and management of their respective departments; these reports, with those of the other officers of the executive department, shall be submitted to the Governor, to be transmitted by him with his message to the General Assembly.

History.

1800, c. 557, s. 2, P.R; Code, s. 2865; Rev., s. 4410; C.S., s. 6099.

§ 120-12.1.
Reports on vacant positions in the Judicial Department and two other departments. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Judicial Department, the Department of Justice, and the Department of Public Safety shall each report by February 1 of each year to the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees and the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety on all positions within that department that have remained vacant for 12 months or more. The report shall include the original position vacancy dates, the dates of any postings or repostings of the positions, and an explanation for the length of the vacancies.

History.

1998-212, s. 16.23; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (h); 2012-83, s. 42; 2013-410, s. 10.

§ 120-12.1.
Reports on vacant positions in various departments. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Judicial Department, the Department of Justice, the Department of Adult Correction, and the Department of Public Safety shall each report by February 1 of each year to the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees and the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety on all positions within that department that have remained vacant for 12 months or more. The report shall include the original position vacancy dates, the dates of any postings or repostings of the positions, and an explanation for the length of the vacancies.

History.

1998-212, s. 16.23; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (h); 2012-83, s. 42; 2013-410, s. 10; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(mmm).

§ 120-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1961, c. 243, s. 1.